Massachusetts, session 194th, H3812.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1: 
Section 36 of chapter 85 of the MGL as appearing in the 2022 edition, his hereby 
amended by inserting at the end thereof the following: 
Section 36A 
Except as otherwise provided in this section, a driver of a motor vehicle or motor carrier 
vehicle being operated on a public roadway of this Commonwealth shall make reasonable efforts 
to remove accumulated ice or snow from the motor vehicle or motor carrier vehicle, including 
the hood, trunk and roof of the motor vehicle or motor carrier vehicle, within 24 hours after the 
cessation of the falling snow or ice.  

of 2 10  Section 36A shall not apply if: 
(i) the driver of the motor carrier vehicle, mass transit vehicle, bus or school bus is en 
route to a facility to remove accumulated ice or snow at the time of the stop under paragraph (3); 
or 
(ii) compliance with this section would cause the driver of the motor carrier vehicle, mass 
transit vehicle, bus or school bus to violate any other Federal or State law or regulation regarding 
workplace safety or would be a threat to the health and safety of the driver. 
(iii) A driver of a motor vehicle or motor carrier vehicle who violates this subsection may 
be stopped on a public roadway by a police officer if the police officer believes the accumulated 
ice or snow may pose a threat to persons or property. 
2. A violation of this section shall be subject to a penalty as promulgated in chapter 85, 
section 36 of the Massachusetts General Laws.